Massachusetts, session 194th, H3213.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the city of
Springfield may appropriate funds to its Aid to the Elderly and Disabled Taxation Fund
established pursuant to section 3D of chapter 60 of the General Laws
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1